California statutes. Civil Code
As used in this section and Sections 2079.7 and 2079.14 to 2079.24, inclusive, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Agent” means a person acting under provisions of Title 9 (commencing with Section 2295) in a real property transaction, and includes a person who is licensed as a real estate broker under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10130) of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, and under whose license a listing is executed or an offer to purchase is obtained.

The agent in the real property transaction bears responsibility for that agent’s salespersons or broker associates who perform as agents of the agent. When a salesperson or broker associate owes a duty to any principal, or to any buyer or seller
 who is not a principal, in a real property transaction, that duty is equivalent to the duty owed to that party by the broker for whom the salesperson or broker associate functions.

(b) “Buyer” means a transferee in a real property transaction, and includes a person who executes an offer to purchase real property from a seller through an agent, or who seeks the services of an agent in more than a casual, transitory, or preliminary manner, with the object of entering into a real property transaction. “Buyer” includes a vendee or lessee of real property.

(c) “Commercial real property” means all real property in the state, except (1) single-family residential real property, (2) dwelling units made subject to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1940) of Title 5, (3) a mobilehome, as defined in Section 798.3, (4) vacant land, or (5) a recreational vehicle, as defined in Section
 799.29.

(d) “Dual agent” means an agent acting, either directly or through a salesperson or broker associate, as agent for both the seller and the buyer in a real property transaction.

(e) “Listing agreement” means a written contract between a seller of real property and an agent, by which the agent has been authorized to sell the real property or to find or obtain a buyer, including rendering other services for which a real estate license is required to the seller pursuant to the terms of the agreement.

(f) “Seller’s agent” means a person who has obtained a listing of real property to act as an agent for compensation.

(g) “Listing price” is the amount expressed in dollars specified in the listing for which the seller is willing to sell the real
 property through the seller’s agent.

(h) “Offering price” is the amount expressed in dollars specified in an offer to purchase for which the buyer is willing to buy the real property.

(i) “Offer to purchase” means a written contract executed by a buyer acting through a buyer’s agent that becomes the contract for the sale of the real property upon acceptance by the seller.

(j) “Real property” means any estate specified by subdivision (1) or (2) of Section 761 in property, and includes (1) single-family residential property, (2) multiunit residential property with more than four dwelling units, (3) commercial real property, (4) vacant land, (5) a ground lease coupled with improvements, or (6) a manufactured home as defined in Section 18007 of the Health and Safety Code, or a mobilehome as defined in Section 18008 of
 the Health and Safety Code, when offered for sale or sold through an agent pursuant to the authority contained in Section 10131.6 of the Business and Professions Code.

(k) “Real property transaction” means a transaction for the sale of real property in which an agent is retained by a buyer, seller, or both a buyer and seller to act in that transaction, and includes a listing or an offer to purchase.

(l) “Single-family residential property” or “single-family residential real property” means any of the following:

(1) Real property improved with one to four dwelling units, including a leasehold exceeding one year’s duration.

(2) A unit in a residential stock cooperative, condominium, or planned unit development.

(3) A mobilehome or manufactured home when offered for sale or sold through a real estate broker pursuant to Section 10131.6 of the Business and Professions Code.

(m) “Sell,” “sale,” or “sold” refers to a transaction for the transfer of real property from the seller to the buyer and includes exchanges of real property between the seller and buyer, transactions for the creation of a real property sales contract within the meaning of Section 2985, and transactions for the creation of a leasehold exceeding one year’s duration.

(n) “Seller” means the transferor in a real property transaction and includes an owner who lists real property with an agent, whether or not a transfer results, or who receives an offer to purchase real property of which they are the owner from an agent on behalf of another. “Seller” includes both a
 vendor and a lessor of real property.

(o) “Buyer’s agent” means an agent who represents a buyer in a real property transaction.

(p) “buyer-broker representation agreement” means a written contract between a buyer of real property and a buyer’s agent by which the buyer’s agent has been authorized by the buyer to provide services set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 10131 of the Business and Professions Code for or on behalf of the buyer for which a real estate license is required pursuant to the terms of the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 516, Sec. 3.   (AB 2992)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.14.

(a) A copy of the disclosure form specified in Section 2079.16 shall be provided in a real property transaction as follows:

(1) The seller’s agent, if any, shall provide the disclosure form to the seller before entering into the listing agreement.

(2) The buyer’s agent shall provide the disclosure form to the buyer as soon as practicable before execution of a buyer-broker representation agreement and execution of the buyer’s offer to purchase. If the offer to purchase is not prepared by the buyer’s agent, the buyer’s agent shall present the disclosure form to the buyer not later than the next business day after receiving the offer to purchase from the buyer.

(b) The agent providing the disclosure form specified in Section 2079.16 shall obtain a signed acknowledgment of receipt from the buyer or seller except as provided in Section 2079.15.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 516, Sec. 4.   (AB 2992)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.15.

In any circumstance in which the seller or buyer refuses to sign an acknowledgment of receipt pursuant to Section 2079.14, the agent shall set forth, sign, and date a written declaration of the facts of the refusal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 40.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.16.

The disclosure form required by Section 2079.14 shall have Sections 2079.13 to 2079.24, inclusive, excluding this section, printed on the back, and on the front of the disclosure form the following shall appear:

DISCLOSURE REGARDING 
REAL ESTATE AGENCY RELATIONSHIP 
(As required by the Civil Code)

When you enter into a discussion with a real estate agent regarding a real estate transaction, you should from the outset understand what type of agency relationship or representation you wish to have with the agent in the transaction.

SELLER’S AGENT

A Seller’s agent under a listing agreement with the Seller acts as the agent for the Seller only. A Seller’s
 agent or a subagent of that agent has the following affirmative obligations:
To the Seller:

A fiduciary duty of utmost care, integrity, honesty, and loyalty in dealings with the Seller. 
To the Buyer and the Seller:

(a) Diligent exercise of reasonable skill and care in performance of the agent’s duties.

(b) A duty of honest and fair dealing and good faith.

(c) A duty to disclose all facts known to the agent materially affecting the value or desirability of the property that are not known to, or within the diligent attention and observation of, the parties.

An agent is not obligated to reveal to either party any confidential information obtained from the other party that does not involve the affirmative duties set forth
 above.

BUYER’S AGENT

A Buyer’s agent can, with a Buyer’s consent, agree to act as agent for the Buyer only. This includes a Buyer’s agent under a buyer-broker representation agreement with the Buyer. In these situations, the agent is not the Seller’s agent, even if by agreement the agent may receive compensation for services rendered, either in full or in part from the Seller. An agent acting only for a Buyer has the following affirmative obligations:
To the Buyer:

A fiduciary duty of utmost care, integrity, honesty, and loyalty in dealings with the Buyer.
To the Buyer and the Seller:

(a) Diligent exercise of reasonable skill and care in performance of the agent’s duties.

(b) A duty of honest and fair dealing and good faith.

(c) A duty to disclose all facts known to the agent materially affecting the value or desirability of the property that are not known to, or within the diligent attention and observation of, the parties. An agent is not obligated to reveal to either party any confidential information obtained from the other party that does not involve the affirmative duties set forth above.

AGENT REPRESENTING BOTH SELLER AND BUYER

A real estate agent, either acting directly or through one or more salespersons and broker associates, can legally be the agent of both the Seller and the Buyer in a transaction, but only with the knowledge and consent of both the Seller and the Buyer.

In a dual agency situation, the agent has the following affirmative obligations to both the Seller and the Buyer:

(a) A fiduciary duty of utmost care, integrity, honesty, and loyalty in the dealings with either the Seller or the Buyer.

(b) Other duties to the Seller and the Buyer as stated above in their respective sections.

In representing both Seller and Buyer, a dual agent may not, without the express permission of the respective party, disclose to the other party confidential information, including, but not limited to, facts relating to either the Buyer’s or Seller’s financial position, motivations, bargaining position, or other personal information that may impact price, including the Seller’s willingness to accept a price less than the listing price or the Buyer’s willingness to pay a price greater than the price offered.

SELLER AND BUYER RESPONSIBILITIES

Either the purchase agreement or a separate document will contain a confirmation of which agent is representing you and whether that agent is representing you exclusively in the transaction or acting as a dual agent. Please pay attention to that confirmation to make sure it accurately reflects your understanding of your agent’s role.

The above duties of the agent in a real estate transaction do not relieve a Seller or Buyer from the responsibility to protect their own interests. You should carefully read all agreements to assure that they adequately express your understanding of the transaction. A real estate agent is a person qualified to advise about real estate. If legal or tax advice is desired, consult a competent professional.

If you are a Buyer, you have the duty to exercise reasonable care to protect yourself, including as to those facts about the property which are known to
 you or within your diligent attention and observation.

Both Sellers and Buyers should strongly consider obtaining tax advice from a competent professional because the federal and state tax consequences of a transaction can be complex and subject to change.

Throughout your real property transaction you may receive more than one disclosure form, depending upon the number of agents assisting in the transaction. The law requires each agent with whom you have more than a casual relationship to present you with this disclosure form. You should read its contents each time it is presented to you, considering the relationship between you and the real estate agent in your specific transaction.

This disclosure form includes the provisions of Sections 2079.13 to 2079.24, inclusive, of the Civil Code set forth on the reverse hereof. Read it carefully.Agent(date)Buyer/Seller(date)(Signature)Salesperson or Broker Associate, if any(date)Buyer/Seller(date)(Signature)(Signature)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 516, Sec. 5.   (AB 2992)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.17.

(a) As soon as practicable, the buyer’s agent shall disclose to the buyer and seller whether the agent is acting in the real property transaction as the buyer’s agent, or as a dual agent representing both the buyer and the seller. This relationship shall be confirmed in the contract to purchase and sell real property or in a separate writing executed or acknowledged by the seller, the buyer, and the buyer’s
 agent prior to or coincident with execution of that contract by the buyer and the seller, respectively.

(b) As soon as practicable, the seller’s agent shall disclose to the seller whether the seller’s agent is acting in the real property transaction as the seller’s agent, or as a dual agent representing both the buyer and seller. This relationship shall be confirmed in the contract to purchase and sell real property or in a separate writing executed or acknowledged by the seller and the seller’s agent prior to or coincident with the execution of that contract by the seller. 

(c) The confirmation required by subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be in the following form: (Name of Seller’s Agent, Brokerage firm and license number)is the broker of (check one):[ ]the seller; or[ ]both the buyer and seller. (dual agent) (Name of Seller’s Agent and license number)is (check one):[ ]is the Seller’s Agent. (salesperson or broker associate)[ ]is both the Buyer’s and Seller’s Agent. (dual agent) (Name of Buyer’s Agent, Brokerage firm and license number)is the broker of (check one):[ ]the buyer; or[ ]both the buyer and seller. (dual agent) (Name of Buyer’s Agent and license number)is (check one):[ ]the Buyer’s Agent. (salesperson or broker associate)[ ]both the Buyer’s and Seller’s Agent. (dual agent)(d) The disclosures and confirmation required by this section shall be in addition to the disclosure required by Section 2079.14. An agent’s duty to provide disclosure and confirmation of representation in this section may be performed by a real estate salesperson or broker associate affiliated with that broker.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 42.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.19.

The payment of compensation or the obligation to pay compensation to an agent by the seller or buyer is not necessarily determinative of a particular agency relationship between an agent and the seller or buyer. A listing agent and a selling agent may agree to share any compensation or commission paid, or any right to any compensation or commission for which an obligation arises as the result of a real estate transaction, and the terms of any such agreement shall not necessarily be determinative of a particular relationship.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 428, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.20.

Nothing in this article prevents an agent from selecting, as a condition of the agent’s employment, a specific form of agency relationship not specifically prohibited by this article if the requirements of Section 2079.14 and Section 2079.17 are complied with.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 428, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.21.

(a) A dual agent may not, without the express permission of the seller, disclose to the buyer any confidential information obtained from the seller.

(b) A dual agent may not, without the express permission of the buyer, disclose to the seller any confidential information obtained from the buyer.

(c) “Confidential information” means facts relating to the client’s financial position, motivations, bargaining position, or other personal information that may impact price, such as the seller is willing to accept a price less than the listing price or the buyer is willing to pay a price greater than the price offered. 

(d) This section does not alter in any way the duty or responsibility of a dual agent to any principal with respect to confidential information other than price.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 44.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.22.

Nothing in this article precludes a seller’s agent from also being a buyer’s agent. If a seller or buyer in a transaction chooses to not be represented by an agent, that does not, of itself, make that agent a dual agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 45.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.23.

(a) A contract between the principal and agent may be modified or altered to change the agency relationship at any time before the performance of the act which is the object of the agency with the written consent of the parties to the agency relationship.

(b) A lender or an auction company retained by a lender to control aspects of a
 transaction of real property subject to this part, including validating the sales price, shall not require, as a condition of receiving the lender’s approval of the transaction, the homeowner or listing agent to defend or indemnify the lender or auction company from any liability alleged to result from the actions of the lender or auction company. Any clause, provision, covenant, or agreement purporting to impose an obligation to defend or indemnify a lender or an auction company in violation of this subdivision is against public policy, void, and unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   (AB 2039)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.24.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to either diminish the duty of disclosure owed buyers and sellers by agents and their associate licensees, subagents, and employees or to relieve agents and their associate licensees, subagents, and employees from liability for their conduct in connection with acts governed by this article or for any breach of a fiduciary duty or a duty of disclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 428, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2079.25.

The provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 1102.1 shall apply to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 46.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Unsolicited Offers to Purchase Real Property Affected by January 2025 Fires in the Counties of Los Angeles and Ventura [2079.26. - 2079.26.]

2079.26.

(a) A person shall not make an unsolicited offer to purchase residential real property in the 90049, 90263, 90265, 90272, 90290, 90402, 91001, 91024, 91103, 91104, 91106, 91107, 91301, 91302, or 91320 ZIP Codes.

(b) (1) Prior to the transfer of title in the purchase of residential real property described in subdivision (a), the buyer and seller shall execute a written attestation affirming that the purchase agreement was not entered into as a result of an unsolicited offer in violation of subdivision (a).

(2) The signed attestation described in paragraph (1) shall create a
 presumption that the accepted offer was solicited by the seller of the property, unless there is clear and convincing evidence to the contrary.

(3) The buyer shall record the signed attestation described in paragraph (1) as an attachment to the deed or other conveyance of title when recording the transfer of title.

(4) Failure to record the signed attestation described in paragraph (1) as an attachment to the deed or other conveyance of title shall not affect any constructive notice imparted by proper recordation of the deed or other conveyance and shall not affect the rights of any subsequent bona fide purchaser or encumbrancer.

(c) A person licensed pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 10000) of the
 Business and Professions Code who makes a written offer on their own behalf, or on behalf of another person while conducting licensed activity, in violation of this section shall be deemed to have violated that person’s licensing law.

(d) The Attorney General, a county counsel, city attorney, or a district attorney may bring a civil action to enforce this section.

(e) (1) A seller shall have the right to cancel a purchase agreement entered into in violation of this section, exercisable until four months after the date of execution of the contract.

(2) A person who violates subdivision (a) may be assessed a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per violation. The
 civil penalty may be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(3) A person who violates subdivision (a) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment not to exceed six months.

(4) The remedies and penalties provided by this subdivision are nonexclusive and are in addition to any other remedies or penalties available under other laws.

(f) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Person” includes a corporation, firm, partnership, or association existing under or authorized by the laws of this state or any
 other state, or any foreign country.

(2) “Unsolicited offer to purchase” means any offer to purchase a property made by any person by text message, email, telephone call, mail, or other means of communication, unless either of the following conditions are met:

(A) At or before the time that the offer is made, there is public indication that the owner is willing to sell the property, including, but not limited to:

(i) The property is listed for sale by the owner or their agent on a multiple listing service or in any publicly available marketing platform.

(ii) The owner placed a “for sale” sign on the property or advertised the property for sale in a
 print publication or a flyer posted in a public place.

(B) The offer was made prior to the enactment of this section.

(g) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(h) This article shall become operative 30 days after the effective date of the act that added this section.

(i) This article shall be repealed on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 535, Sec. 1.   (AB 851)   Effective October 10, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 3, commencing with Section 2079.26.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Lost and Unclaimed Property [2080. - 2082.]



  ARTICLE 1. Lost Money and Goods [2080. - 2080.10.]

2080.

Any person who finds a thing lost is not bound to take charge of it, unless the person is otherwise required to do so by contract or law, but when the person does take charge of it he or she is thenceforward a depositary for the owner, with the rights and obligations of a depositary for hire. Any person or any public or private entity that finds and takes possession of any money, goods, things in action, or other personal property, or saves any domestic animal from harm, neglect, drowning, or starvation, shall, within a reasonable time, inform the owner, if
 known, and make restitution without compensation, except a reasonable charge for saving and taking care of the property. Any person who takes possession of a live domestic animal shall provide for humane treatment of the animal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 752, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2080.1.

(a) If the owner is unknown or has not claimed the property, the person saving or finding the property shall, if the property is of the value of one hundred dollars ($100) or more, within a reasonable time turn the property over to the police department of the city or city and county, if found therein, or to the sheriff’s department of the county if found outside of city limits, and shall make an affidavit, stating when and where he or she found or saved the property, particularly describing it. If the property was saved, the
 affidavit shall state:

(1) From what and how it was saved.

(2) Whether the owner of the property is known to the affiant.

(3) That the affiant has not secreted, withheld, or disposed of any part of the property.

(b) The police department or the sheriff’s department shall notify the owner, if his or her identity is reasonably ascertainable, that it possesses the property and where it may be claimed. The police department or sheriff’s department may require payment by the owner of a reasonable charge to defray costs of storage and care of the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 138, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2080.2.

If the owner appears within 90 days, after receipt of the property by the police department or sheriff’s department, proves his ownership of the property, and pays all reasonable charges, the police department or sheriff’s department shall restore the property to him.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1512.)
-------------------------------------------

2080.3.

(a) If the reported value of the property is two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or more and no owner appears and proves his or her ownership of the property within 90 days, the police department or sheriff’s department shall cause notice of the property to be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation. If, after seven days following the first publication of the notice, no owner appears and proves his or her ownership of the property and the person who found or saved the property pays the cost of the publication, the
 title shall vest in the person who found or saved the property unless the property was found in the course of employment by an employee of any public agency, in which case the property shall be sold at public auction. Title to the property shall not vest in the person who found or saved the property or in the successful bidder at the public auction unless the cost of publication is first paid to the city, county, or city and county whose police or sheriff’s department caused the notice to be published.

(b) If the reported value of the property is less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and no owner appears and proves his or her ownership of the property within 90 days, the title shall vest in the person who found or saved the property, unless the property was found in the course of employment by an employee of any public agency, in which case the property shall be sold at public auction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 138, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2080.4.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 2080.3 or Section 2080.6, the legislative body of any city, city and county, or county may provide by ordinance for the care, restitution, sale or destruction of unclaimed property in the possession of the police department of such city or city and county or of the sheriff of such county. Any city, city and county, or county adopting such an ordinance shall provide therein (1) that such unclaimed property shall be held by the police department or sheriff for a period of at least three months, and (2) that thereafter such property will be sold at public auction to the highest bidder, with notice of such sale
 being given by the chief of police or sheriff at least five days before the time fixed therefor by publication once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county, or that thereafter such property will be transferred to the local government purchasing and stores agency or other similar agency for sale to the public at public auction. If such property is transferred to a county purchasing agent it may be sold in the manner provided by Article 7 (commencing with Section 25500) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code for the sale of surplus personal property. If property is transferred to the local government purchasing and stores agency or other similar agency pursuant to this section, such property shall not be redeemable by the owner or other person entitled to possession. If the local government purchasing and stores agency or other similar agency determines that any such property transferred to it for sale is needed for a public use, such property may be
 retained by the agency and need not be sold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2080.5.

The police department or sheriff’s department may sell such property by public auction, in the manner and upon the notice of sale of personal property under execution, if it is a thing which is commonly the subject of sale, when the owner cannot, with reasonable diligence, be found, or, being found, refuses upon demand to pay the lawful charges provided by Sections 2080 and 2080.1, in the following cases:

(1) When the thing is in danger of perishing, or of losing the greater part of its value; or,

(2) When the lawful charges provided by
 Sections 2080 and 2080.1 amount to two-thirds of its value.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1512.)
-------------------------------------------

2080.6.

(a) Any public agency may elect to be governed by the provisions of this article with respect to disposition of personal property found or saved on property subject to its jurisdiction, or may adopt reasonable regulations for the care, restitution, sale or destruction of unclaimed property in its possession. Any public agency adopting such regulations shall provide therein (1) that such unclaimed property shall be held by such agency for a period of at least three months, (2) that thereafter such property will be sold at public auction to the highest bidder, and (3) that notice of such sale shall be given by the chief administrative officer of such agency at least five days before the time fixed therefor by publication once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which such property was found. Any property remaining unsold after being offered at such public auction may be destroyed or otherwise disposed of by the public agency. In a county having a purchasing agent, the purchasing agent may conduct such sale, in which case the provisions of subdivisions (2) and (3) of this section shall not be applicable. Such sale shall be made by the county purchasing agent in the manner provided by Article 7 (commencing with Section 25500) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code for the sale of surplus personal property. If the public agency determines that any such property transferred to it for sale is needed for a public use, such property may be retained by the agency and need not be sold.

(b) “Public agency” as used in this section means any state agency, including the Department of General Services and the Department of Parks and Recreation, any city, county, city and county, special district, or other political subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1282, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2080.7.

The provisions of this article have no application to things which have been intentionally abandoned by their owner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1512.)
-------------------------------------------

2080.8.

(a) The Regents of the University of California and the Trustees of the California State University, as applicable, may provide by resolution or regulation for the care, restitution, sale, or destruction of unclaimed, lost, or abandoned property in the possession of the Regents of the University of California, the University of California Police Department, or any state university.

(b) Any resolution or regulation adopted pursuant to this section shall provide therein (1) that unclaimed, lost, or abandoned property valued at or above three hundred dollars ($300) shall be held by the Regents of the University of California, the University of California Police Department, or the particular state university for a period of at least three months, (2) that thereafter the property will be sold at public auction to the highest bidder, and (3) that notice of that sale shall be given by the Regents of the University of California, the University of California Police Department, or the Trustees of the California State University at least five days before the time therefor by publication once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the property is held.

(c) The Regents of the
 University of California or the Trustees of the California State University may dispose of any of that property upon which no bid is made at any sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 199, Sec. 1.   (AB 1890)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2080.10.

(a) When a public agency obtains possession of personal property from a person for temporary safekeeping, the public agency shall do all of the following:

(1) Take responsibility for the storage, documentation, and disposition of the property.

(2) Provide the person from whom the property was taken with a receipt and instructions for the retrieval of the property. The receipt and instructions shall either be
 given to the person from whom the property was taken at the time the public agency obtains the property or immediately mailed, by first-class mail, to the person from whom the property was taken.

(3) If the public agency has knowledge that the person from whom the property was taken is not the owner, the agency shall make reasonable efforts to identify the owner. If the owner is identified, the public agency shall mail, by first-class mail, a receipt and instructions for the retrieval of the property.

(b) The receipt and instructions shall notify the person from whom the property was taken that the property must be claimed within 60 days after the public agency obtains possession or the property will be disposed of in accordance with the disposal provisions of this article. Within 60 days, the person may do one of the following:

(1) Retrieve the property.

(2) Authorize in writing another person to retrieve the property.

(3) Notify the public agency in writing that he or she is unable to retrieve the property, because he or she is in custody, and request the public agency to hold the property. If a person notifies the public agency that he or she is unable to retrieve the property within 60 days, or have an authorized person retrieve the property, the public agency shall hold the property for not longer than 10 additional months.

(c) The public agency shall not be liable for damages caused by any official action performed with due care regarding the disposition of personal property pursuant to this section and the disposal provisions of this article.

(d) As used in
 this section, “public agency” means any state agency, any city, county, city and county, special district, or other political subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 540, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Unclaimed Property [2081. - 2081.6.]

2081.

When any goods, merchandise, or other property has been received by any railroad or express company, other common carrier, commission merchant, innkeeper, or warehouseman, for transportation or safekeeping, and is not delivered to the owner, consignee, or other authorized person, the carrier, commission merchant, innkeeper, or warehouseman may hold or store the property with some responsible person until the freight and all just and reasonable charges are paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 656.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.1.

If within 60 days after its receipt no person calls for the property and pays the freight and charges upon it, the carrier, commission merchant, innkeeper, or warehouseman may sell the property, or so much of it as will pay freight and charges, to the highest bidder at public auction, after first causing such notice of sale to be given as is customary in sales of goods by auction at the place where the goods are held or stored.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 656.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.2.

If any surplus remains after paying the freight, storage, expenses of sale, and other reasonable charges, the sum remaining shall be paid over to the owner of the property, upon his demand at any time within 60 days after the sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 656.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.3.

If the owner or his agent fails to demand the surplus within 60 days after the sale, it shall be paid into the county treasury, subject to the order of the owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 656.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.4.

After the storage of the property the responsibility of the carrier, commission merchant, innkeeper, or warehouseman ceases. The person with whom the property is stored is not liable for loss or damage on its account unless the loss or damage results from his negligence or want of proper care.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 656.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.5.

When any commission merchant or warehouseman receives produce, merchandise, or other property on consignment and makes advances upon it, either to the owner or for freight and charges, if the advances are not paid to him within 60 days from the date made, he may cause the produce, merchandise, or property on which the advances were made, to be advertised and sold pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 656.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.6.

All proceedings pursuant to this article are governed entirely by its provisions and are not controlled or affected by Article 2, Chapter 3, Title 7, Part 4, Division 3 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 656.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Fees of Officers [2082. - 2082.]

2082.

The fees of officers under this chapter are the same allowed by law for similar services, and shall be paid by the taker up or finder and recovered from the owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 656.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 7. CARRIAGE [2085. - 2218.]



  CHAPTER 1. Carriage in General [2085. - 2090.]

2085.

The contract of carriage is a contract for the conveyance of property, persons, or messages, from one place to another.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2086.

Carriage is either:

1. Inland; or,

2. Marine.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2087.

Carriers upon the ocean and upon arms of the sea are marine carriers. All others are inland carriers.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2088.

Rights and duties peculiar to carriers by sea are defined by Acts of Congress.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2089.
